Utah statutes.
72-11-104.   Laws applicable to construction contracts and contractor's bonds.

(1) Construction contracts entered into by the committee under the authority of this chapter shall be governed solely by this chapter, except that they are subject to the approval of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.

(2)  The provisions of Title 14, Chapter 1, Public Contracts requiring contractor's bonds are expressly made applicable to any construction contract under this chapter when the amount of the contract exceeds $1,000.

